lexc/num/enhunum1.lexc
LEXICON Possoet
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenr§d       Szoroet;  ! od,ed,öd
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Suboet;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famoet;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famoet;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famoet;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famoet;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famoet;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famoet;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famoet;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famoet;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famoet;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famoet;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famoet;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famoet;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1oet;

LEXICON Pluroet
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genoet;
                            Gen1oet;
        
LEXICON Famoet
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genoet;
                       Genoet;
LEXICON Fam1oet
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genoet;
                       Gen1oet;

LEXICON Genoet
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseoet;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseoet;
                       Caseoet;
LEXICON Gen1oet
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseoet;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseoet;
                       Case1oet;
 
LEXICON Caseoet
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Case1oet
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^en        #;  ! on, en, ön, n 
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Szoroet
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Suboet;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc_et;  ! ik
                            #;

LEXICON Suboet
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! i
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;

LEXICON AddNumketthet2
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Possketthet2;

LEXICON Possketthet2
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenr§d       Szorketthet2;  ! od,ed,öd

LEXICON Szorketthet2
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Subketthet2;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc;  ! ik
                            #;
LEXICON Subketthet2
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;

LEXICON NumAcc
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
                    #;

LEXICON NumAcc_et
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^et       #;  !et
                    #;
LEXICON NumAcc_at
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^at       #;  !at
                    #;
                    

LEXICON Num
kettő:más AddNumketthet2; 
